Hawaii statutes.
§386-174 Appropriation. So much of the
state insurance fund as may be necessary is hereby appropriated and shall, with
the approval of the governor, be expended to pay claims found to be due under
section 386-171 for services performed under the authorized direction of a
public officer or employee. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-163; HRS
§386-174]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next